Hawaii statutes.
§501-142 Mechanic's lien. When a
mechanic's lien or lien for labor and materials is claimed upon registered and
unregistered land, and the notice required by law is filed in the circuit court
where the land is situated, an attested copy of the order directing the lien to
attach which contains or has indorsed upon it a reference to the certificate of
title of the land affected shall be filed or recorded with the assistant
registrar and registered. [L 1903, c 56, §77; RL 1925, §3266; RL 1935, §5075;
RL 1945, §12675; RL 1955, §342-75; HRS §501-142; am L 1986, c 246, §16]

Rules of Court

Mechanic's lien, see RLC rule 62(b).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next